src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin ! 
arna+Sem/Dummytag:arn MAANA ;
gapta+Sem/Dummytag:gapt MAANA ;
håagk’staavra+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:håagkh#staavr MAANA ;
kråvna+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:krovn MAANA ;
maadteraajja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:maadter#aajj MAANA ;  !!! PX-Lexicon! PX-lexicon
neajta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:neajt MAANA ;
sjåarhta+Sem/Dummytag:sjåarht MAANA ;
åejviehearra+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:åejvie#hearr MAANA ;
LEXICON NounPx ! 
skuamtelemåvhkah:skuamtele#måvhk MÅVHKAH ;
tjidtjetjeguaktah:tjidtjetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
tjædtjetjeguaktah:tjædtjetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
aahtjetjeguaktah:aahtjetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
aehtjetjeguaktah:aehtjetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
aahketjeguaktah:aahketje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
gaalletjeguaktah:gaalletje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
vïelletjeguaktah:vïelletje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
eatnetjeguaktah:eatnetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
åabpetjeguaktah:åabpetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
voehpetjeguaktah:voehpetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
muahretjeguaktah:muahretje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
paarretjeguaktah:paarretje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
seasetjeguaktah:seasetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
skïeptåajja:skïept#åajj MAANA ;
harra:harr MAANA ; 
aabroedæjja+Sem/Dummytag:aabroedæjj MAANA ;
hapmah+Sem/Dummytag:hapm MÅVHKAH ;
aahtjetje-guaktah+CmpNP/None+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:aahtjetje#guakt MÅVHKAH ;
aehtjetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:aehtjetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
alla+Sem/Dummytag:all MAANA ;
råapah+Sem/Dummytag:råap MÅVHKAH ;
bealla+Sem/Dummytag:beall MAANA ;
mihtegassjah+Sem/Dummytag:mihtegassj MÅVHKAH ;
båala+Sem/Dummytag:båal MAANA ;
bægkah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:bægk MÅVHKAH ;
daabloehtæjja+Sem/Dummytag:daabloehtæjj MAANA ;
duarsta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+OLang/NOB+Sem/Dummytag:duarst MAANA ;
neebnetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:neebnetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
mådtsahvaarjah+Sem/Dummytag:mådtsahvaarj MÅVHKAH ;
faasta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:faast MAANA ;
gaalletje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:gaalletje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
gaarva+Sem/Dummytag:gaarv MAANA ;
gealta+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:gealt MAANA ;
guapamåvhkah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:guapa#måvhk MÅVHKAH ;
gæsta+Sem/Dummytag:gæst MAANA ;
hårsa+Sem/Dummytag:hårs MAANA ;
eatnetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:eatnetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
jåara+Sem/Dummytag:jåar MAANA ;
kråaptja+Sem/Dummytag:kråaptj MAANA ;
laavetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:laavetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
leasja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:leasj MAANA ;
measka+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:meask MAANA ;
meedije+OLang/NOB+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:medij MÅVHKAH ;
njålhtja+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:njålhtj MAANA ;
plakta+Sem/Dummytag:plakt MAANA ;
prællah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:præll MÅVHKAH ;
raavsa+Sem/Dummytag:raavs MAANA ;
råavra+Sem/Dummytag:råavr MAANA ;
seahka+Sem/Dummytag:seahk MAANA ;
skaarjah+Sem/Dummytag:skaarj MÅVHKAH ;
skajja+Sem/Dummytag:skajj MAANA ;
skårhta+Sem/Dummytag:skårht MAANA ;
skænhkah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:skænhk MÅVHKAH ;
smædja+Sem/Dummytag:smædj MAANA ;
speatna+Sem/Dummytag:speatn MAANA ;
svaala+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:svaal MAANA ;
taska+Sem/Dummytag:task MAANA ;
tjeatsetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:tjeatsetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
jöönetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:jöönetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
muahretje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:muahretje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
tjidtjetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:tjidtjetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
tjietsetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:tjietsetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
tjåtska+Sem/Dummytag:tjåtsk MAANA ;
vaalhka+Sem/Dummytag:vaalhk MAANA ;
vaarah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:vaar MÅVHKAH ;
voehpetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:voehpetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
våhkoetjåanghkoe+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:våhka#tjåanghk MAANA ;
åabpetje-guaktah+CmpNP/Last+CmpN/SgNomLeft+Sem/Dummytag:åabpetje-guakt MÅVHKAH ;
ålloemåvhkah+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:ålloe#måvhk MÅVHKAH ;
fylhkeålma+Sem/Dummytag:fylhke#ålm MAANA ;
beadnga+Sem/Dummytag:beadng MAANA ;
såalka+Sem/Dummytag:såalk MAANA ;
